Utah statutes.
35A-8-507.   Application process and priorities.

(1) (a)  In each calendar year that money is available from the fund for distribution by the executive director under the direction of the board, the executive director shall, at least once in that year, announce a grant and loan application period by sending notice to interested persons.

(b)  The executive director shall accept applications that are received in a timely manner.

(2)  The executive director shall give first priority to applications for projects and activities that use existing privately owned housing stock, including privately owned housing stock purchased by nonprofit public development authorities.

(3)  The executive director shall give preference to applications that demonstrate the following:

(a)  a high degree of leverage with other sources of financing;

(b)  high recipient contributions to total project costs, including allied contributions from other sources such as professional, craft, and trade services and lender interest rate subsidies;

(c)  high local government project contributions in the form of infrastructure improvements, or other assistance;

(d)  projects that encourage ownership, management, and other project-related responsibility opportunities;

(e)  projects that demonstrate a strong probability of serving the original target group or income level for a period of at least 15 years;

(f)  projects where the applicant has demonstrated the ability, stability, and resources to complete the project;

(g)  projects that appear to serve the greatest need;

(h)  projects that provide housing for persons and families with the lowest income;

(i)  projects that promote economic development benefits;

(j)  projects that allow integration into a local government housing plan; and

(k)  projects that would mitigate or correct existing health, safety, or welfare problems.

(4)  The executive director may give consideration to projects that increase the supply of accessible housing.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

